Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-163
Offstreet parking; declaration of purpose.

The Legislature finds and declares that the great increase in the number of motor vehicles, buses, and trucks in Nebraska has created hazards to life and property in cities of the second class in the state. In order to remove or reduce such hazards to life and property and the inconvenience of congested traffic on the streets in such cities in this state, it is hereby deemed necessary and of general benefit to the entire State of Nebraska to provide means for such cities in Nebraska to own offstreet vehicle parking facilities exclusively for the parking of motor vehicles.

Laws 1957, c. 29, § 1, p. 185;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 51.

For applicability of sections 17-163 to 17-173 to villages, see sections 17-207.01 and 17-207.02.